Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 18 Disability Insurance Policies

Cross references. —

For definition of “disability insurance,” see §

26-5-103

.

As to exemption of proceeds of disability insurance, see §

26-15-130

.

As to group and blanket disability insurance, see §§

26-19-101

through

26-19-113

.

As to credit life and disability insurance, see §§

26-21-101

through

26-21-114

.

As to worker's compensation, see §§

27-14-101

through

27-14-805

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 555 to 680, 1050 to 1104; 44 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 1463 to 1475.

Admissibility against beneficiary of life or accident insurance policy of statements of third persons included in or with proof of death, 1 ALR2d 365.

Loss or impairment of vision as within meaning of total disability clause, 1 ALR2d 756.

Loss of hearing as within meaning of total disability clause, 1 ALR2d 952.

Temporary life, accident or health insurance pending approval of application or issuance of policy, 2 ALR2d 943.

Accident insurance policy provisions for diminution of indemnity where insured engages in or does act pertaining to a more hazardous occupation, 8 ALR2d 481.

Proof of death or injury from external and violent means as supporting presumption or inference of death by accidental means within policy of insurance, 12 ALR2d 1264.

Clause in life, accident or health policy excluding or limiting liability in case of insured's use of intoxicants or narcotics, 13 ALR2d 987.

Requirement of disability policy as to proof of disability before reaching specified age as barring recovery where disability occurs before, but proof is made after, attainment of such age, 18 ALR2d 1061.

Construction and effect of provisions of insurance policy specifying diseases, disabilities or organs common, or not common, to both sexes, 23 ALR2d 1021.

Injury to or death of insured while assaulting another as due to accident or accidental means, 26 ALR2d 399.

When is one confined to house within meaning of health or accident insurance policy, 29 ALR2d 1408.

Construction and effect of clause of life, health or similar policy insuring against “loss of business time,” 31 ALR2d 1222.

Provisions in life or accident policy in relation to military service, 36 ALR2d 1018.

Death or injury from sunstroke as accident or result of accidental means within terms of accident provision of insurance policy, 36 ALR2d 1090.

Computation of time with respect to fractions of days in determining duration and determination of risk under accident, health or hospital policy, 38 ALR2d 768.

Scope of clause of insurance policy covering injuries sustained while “in or on” or “in or upon” motor vehicle, 39 ALR2d 952.

Effective date of life, health or accident insurance policy as between premium date stated in policy and later date either of approval, acceptance or delivery of policy or of payment of premium, 44 ALR2d 472, 37 ALR3d 933.

Amount recoverable under loss of member or vision clauses of accident insurance, 44 ALR2d 1233.

Requirement of accident policy or clause that there be some external or visible evidence of collision or accident on the motor vehicle in which insured was riding, 47 ALR2d 1248.

Death or injury resulting from insured's voluntary act in taking overdose of medicine, drugs or the like as caused by accident or accidental means, 52 ALR2d 1083.

Clause in health and accident or similar policy reducing amount of or terminating periodic payments after insured reaches specified age as applicable to disability incurred before such age was reached, 53 ALR2d 552.

What constitutes “hernia” within exclusionary clause of health or accident insurance policy, 55 ALR2d 1020.

What constitutes medical or surgical treatment or the like within exclusionary clause of accident policy or accidental death feature of life policy, 65 ALR2d 1449.

Student accident policy, 74 ALR2d 1253.

Insurer's liability under accident policy which terminated after accidental injury but prior to completion of medical treatment, hospitalization and the like, 75 ALR2d 876.

What amounts to “infirmity” or “deformity” within accident provision of insurance policy, 75 ALR2d 1238.

Scope and application of provisions of accident policy or accident feature of life policy relating to accident in connection with automobile or other motor vehicle, 78 ALR2d 1044.

Arteriosclerosis as affecting right to recovery under accident policy or accident provision of life policy, 82 ALR2d 611.

Payments on other than annual basis as satisfying provision of health and accident policy for increase of insurance benefits based on payment of premiums in advance, 83 ALR2d 696.

Preexisting physical condition as affecting liability under accident policy or accident feature of life policy, 84 ALR2d 176.

Provision of accident or health insurance policy that insured shall be under care of physician or surgeon, 84 ALR2d 375.

Presumption against suicide as overcome as a matter of law by physical facts related to death, 85 ALR2d 722.

Construction and effect of provisions in accident insurance policy referring to “assault,” “felony,” “fighting” and the like by the insured, 86 ALR2d 443.

Fracture or loss of member, or loss of sight, contemplated by accident policy or provision insuring against specific injury, 87 ALR2d 481.

Death or injury resulting from shock, fright or other “psychic trauma” as within coverage of accident policy or accident provisions of life policy, 93 ALR2d 578.

Construction of term “result from” or “as a result of” pregnancy used in life, accident, health or hospitalization policy, 97 ALR2d 1068.

Insanity or mental infirmity or disability within exclusionary clause of health or disability policy, 98 ALR2d 284.

Liability under accident policy or accident feature of life policy for injury or death from freezing or exposure to cold, 4 ALR3d 1177.

Validity, construction and effect of provisions, in insurance policies allowing disability or accident benefits, which require insured to submit to physical examination, 5 ALR3d 929.

Construction and effect of provision of life or accident insurance policy specifically excluding liability for injury or death from poison, 14 ALR3d 783.

“Total disability” or the like as referring to inability to work in usual occupation or other occupations, 21 ALR3d 115.

What constitutes total or permanent disability within the meaning of insurance policy issued to physician or dentist, 21 ALR3d 677.

Heart or vascular condition as constituting total or permanent disability within insurance coverage, 21 ALR3d 1383.

Mental incapacity or disease as constituting total or permanent disability within insurance coverage, 22 ALR3d 1000.

What constitutes permanent or total disability within coverage of disability insurance policy issued to one engaged in retail merchandising, 23 ALR3d 773.

Back injury or condition as constituting total or permanent disability within insurance coverage, 23 ALR3d 1108.

Continuance or resumption of work as affecting finding of total or permanent disability within insurance coverage, 24 ALR3d 8.

Injury or disability resulting from medical treatment for accident as proximately caused by original accident within coverage of accident or disability insurance, 25 ALR3d 1386.

What constitutes total or permanent disability within the coverage of disability insurance coverage issued to farmer or agricultural worker, 26 ALR3d 714.

Insured's statement, in application for life or health insurance or its reinstatement, that he is in good health as absolute representation of or mere statement of his good faith belief in his good health, 26 ALR3d 1061.

Beneficiary's ignorance of existence of life or accident policy as excusing failure to give notice, make proofs of loss or bring action within time limited by policy or statute, 28 ALR3d 292.

Construction and effect of “visible sign of injury” and similar clauses in accident provision of insurance policy, 28 ALR3d 413.

Rights and liabilities under airplane passengers' trip insurance policy, 29 ALR3d 766.

What constitutes permanent or total disability within coverage of insurance policy issued to physical laborer or workman, 32 ALR3d 922.

Clause in life, accident or health policy covering missile or rocket work, 33 ALR3d 694.

Remedies and measure of damages for wrongful cancellation of life, health and accident insurance, 34 ALR3d 245.

Suicide clause of accident insurance as affected by incontestable clause, 37 ALR3d 337.

Construction and validity of provision in accident insurance policy making benefits conditional upon death, disability or loss of member occurring within specified period after accident, 39 ALR3d 1026.

Insured's receipt of or right to workmen's compensation benefits as affecting recovery under accident, hospital or medical expense policy, 40 ALR3d 1012.

Liability under life or accident policy not containing a “violation of the law” clause for death or injury resulting from violation of law by insured, 43 ALR3d 1120.

Sufficiency of showing that death from drowning was due to accident or accidental means in life or accident insurance, 43 ALR3d 1168.

Death or injury intentionally inflicted by another as due to accident or accidental means, 49 ALR3d 673.

What is “conveyance,” “passenger conveyance” or “public conveyance” within coverage of accident policy, 60 ALR3d 858.

Who is “fare-paying passenger” within coverage provision of life or accident insurance policy, 60 ALR3d 1273.

What constitutes “one accident” or “one sickness” or related conditions or recurrences within provisions of health, accident and disability insurance, 61 ALR3d 884.

Construction of provision in health or accident policy extending coverage to persons “actually in the employ of” the policyholder, 64 ALR3d 1178.

“Vehicle” within meaning of insurance coverage or exception, 65 ALR3d 824.

Elimination of particular coverage or termination of health, hospitalization or medical care insurance policy as affecting insurer's liability for insured's continuing hospitalization or medical expenses relating to previously covered illness, 66 ALR3d 1205.

Assault as an “accident” or injuries therefrom as “accidentally” sustained within insurance coverage clause, 72 ALR3d 1090.

Right of insurer under health or hospitalization policy to restitution of payments made under mistake, 79 ALR3d 1113.

Admissibility of opinion evidence as to employability on issue of disability in health and accident insurance and workers' compensation cases, 89 ALR3d 783.

Death during or after surgery as accidental within coverage of health or accident insurance policy, 91 ALR3d 1042.

Construction and application of provision in health or hospitalization policy excluding or postponing coverage of illness for which medical care was received within stated time preceding or following issuance of policy, 95 ALR3d 1290.

Personal injuries inflicted by animal as within homeowner's or personal liability policy, 96 ALR3d 891.

What constitutes total disability within coverage of disability insurance policy issued to lawyer, 6 ALR4th 422.

Automobile liability insurance: what are accidents or injuries “arising out of ownership, maintenance, or use” of insured vehicle, 15 ALR4th 10.

Unborn child as insured or injured person within the meaning of insurance policy, 15 ALR4th 548.

Liability of insurer for damages resulting from delay in passing upon application for health insurance, 18 ALR4th 1115.

Effectiveness of change of named beneficiary of life or accident insurance policy by will, 25 ALR4th 1164.

Construction and application of provision of liability insurance policy expressly excluding injuries intended or expected by insured, 31 ALR4th 957.

Accident insurance: what is “loss” of body member, 51 ALR4th 156.

Accident or life insurance: death by autoerotic asphyxiation as accidental, 62 ALR4th 823.

What services, equipment or supplies are “medically necessary” for purposes of coverage under medical insurance, 75 ALR4th 763.

What constitutes mental illness or disorder, insanity, or the like, within provision limiting or excluding coverage under health or disability policy, 19 ALR5th 533.

Death or injury from taking illegal drugs or narcotics as accidental or result of accidental means within insurance coverage, 32 ALR5th 629.

When is medical expense “incurred” under policy providing for payment of medical expenses incurred within fixed period of time from date of injury, 65 ALR5th 649.

Construction of incontestable clause applicable to disability insurance, 67 ALR5th 513.

Determination of requisite amount in controversy in diversity action in federal district court involving liability under or validity of disability insurance, 11 ALR Fed 120.

Propriety of denial of medical or hospital benefits for investigative, educational or experimental medical procedures pursuant to exclusion contained in ERISA-governed health plan, 122 ALR Fed 1.

44 C.J.S. Insurance § 4; 45 C.J.S. Insurance §§ 562 to 571; 46 C.J.S. Insurance §§ 860 to 896, 1085 to 1102; 46A C.J.S. Insurance §§ 1262 to 1274.